Illinois, session 104th, SB113.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Sections 110-2 and 110-6.1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-2)7    Sec. 110-2. Pretrial release. 8    (a) All persons charged with an offense shall be eligible 9for pretrial release before conviction. It is presumed that a 10defendant is entitled to release on personal recognizance on 11the condition that the defendant attend all required court 12proceedings and the defendant does not commit any criminal 13offense, and complies with all terms of pretrial release, 14including, but not limited to, orders of protection under both 15Section 112A-4 of this Code and Section 214 of the Illinois 16Domestic Violence Act of 1986, all civil no contact orders, 17and all stalking no contact orders. Pretrial release may be 18denied only if a person is charged with an offense listed in 19Section 110-6.1 and after the court has held a hearing under 20Section 110-6.1, and in a manner consistent with subsections 21(b), (c), and (d) of this Section. 22    (b) At all pretrial hearings, the prosecution shall have 23the burden to prove by clear and convincing evidence that any   SB0113- 2 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1condition of release is necessary.2    (c) When it is alleged that pretrial release should be 3denied to a person upon the grounds that the person presents a 4real and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 5or the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 6the case, the burden of proof of such allegations shall be upon 7the State.8    (d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d-1), when 9When it is alleged that pretrial release should be denied to a 10person charged with stalking or aggravated stalking upon the 11grounds set forth in Section 110-6.3, the burden of proof of 12those allegations shall be upon the State. 13    (d-1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this 14Section, if the defendant is charged with a violation of 15Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act 16involving the manufacture or delivery, or possession with 17intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance, a 18counterfeit substance, or controlled substance analog of 15 19grams or more of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog 20thereof, then the burden of proof is on the defendant to show 21by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant's pretrial 22release does not pose a real and present threat to the safety 23of any person or persons or the community, based on the 24specific articulable facts of the case. 25    (e) This Section shall be liberally construed to 26effectuate the purpose of relying on pretrial release by   SB0113- 3 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1nonmonetary means to reasonably ensure an eligible person's 2appearance in court, the protection of the safety of any other 3person or the community, that the person will not attempt or 4obstruct the criminal justice process, and the person's 5compliance with all conditions of release, while authorizing 6the court, upon motion of a prosecutor, to order pretrial 7detention of the person under Section 110-6.1 when it finds 8clear and convincing evidence that no condition or combination 9of conditions can reasonably ensure the effectuation of these 10goals.11(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.) 12    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)13    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-822)14    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 15    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 16hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 17if:18        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 19    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 20    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 21    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment or 22    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 23    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 24    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 25    or persons or the community, based on the specific   SB0113- 4 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    articulable facts of the case;2        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 3    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 4    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 5    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 6    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 7    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 8    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 9    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 10    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 11    of force against another person, residential burglary, 12    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 13    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 14    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 15    disfigurement or any other felony which involves the 16    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 17    disability or disfigurement; 18        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 19    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 20    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 21    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 22    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 23    of the threat upon which the charge is based;24        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 25    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 26    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act   SB0113- 5 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 2    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact 3    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 4    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 5    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 6    or persons or the community, based on the specific 7    articulable facts of the case;8        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 9    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 10    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 11    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 12    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 13    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 14    case;15        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 16    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 17    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 18    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 19    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 20    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 21    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 22    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 23    the case; 24        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 25    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 26    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real   SB0113- 6 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 2    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 3    of the case:4            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 5        firearm);6            (B) Section 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge of a 7        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 8        designed or use for silencing the report of a 9        firearm);10            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 11        firearm);12            (D) Section 24-1.7 (armed habitual criminal);13            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale or transfer 14        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 15        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 16        or flechette shells);17            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 18        firearms);19            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 20        firearms on the premises of any school);21            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 22        liquor license);23            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 24        firearm);25            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);26            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);  SB0113- 7 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);2            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 3        of a minor);4            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);5            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful use 6        or possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 7        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 8        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful use of a 9        weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 10        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 11            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 12        manslaughter);13            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);14            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);15            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 16        endangerment);17            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 18            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 19        restraint); 20            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 21            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 22        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 23        discharge of a firearm); 24        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 25    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 26    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the   SB0113- 8 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 2    the specific articulable facts of the case: 3            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 4        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 5        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);6            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 7        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 8        influence while operating a school bus with 9        passengers);10            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 11        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 12        influence causing great bodily harm);13            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 14        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 15        influence after a previous reckless homicide 16        conviction);17            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 18        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 19        influence leading to death); or20            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 21        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 22        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 23        under the age of 16);24        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 25    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 26    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a   SB0113- 9 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 2    persons or the community, based on the specific 3    articulable facts of the case; or 4        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 5    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:6            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 7        through (a)(7) of this Section; or8            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 9    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 10detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 11probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 12a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 13been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 14indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 15probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 16finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 17misdemeanor.18    (c) Timing of petition. 19        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 20    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 21    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 22    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 23    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 24    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 25    previously released shall not be detained.26        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a   SB0113- 10 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 2    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 3    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 4    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 5    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 6    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 7    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 8    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 9    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 10    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 11    filing of the petition and the hearing.12    (d) Contents of petition.13        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 14    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 15    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 16    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 17    persons or the community, based on the specific 18    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.19        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 20    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 21    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 22    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 23    filing of the previous petition.24    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 25for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 26proving by clear and convincing evidence that:  SB0113- 11 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 2    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 3    subsection (a), and4        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 5    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 6    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 7    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 8    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 9    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 10    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 11    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 12    1986, and13        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 14    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 15    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 16    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 17    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 18    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 19    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 20    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and21        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 22    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 23    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 24    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 25    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 26    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or   SB0113- 12 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 2    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 3    appear in court as required.4    (f) Conduct of the hearings.5        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 6    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 7    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 8    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 9    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 10    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 11    hearing.12        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 13    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.14        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 15    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 16    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 17    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 18    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 19    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 20    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 21    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 22    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 23    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 24    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 25    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 26    conducted via a two-way audio-visual communication system,   SB0113- 13 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 2    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 3        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 4    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 5    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused 6    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 7    court determines that the physical health and safety of 8    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 9    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 10    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 11    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 12    operational challenges must be documented and approved by 13    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 14    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented 15    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 16    Courts every 6 months. 17        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 18    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 19    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 20    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 21    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 22    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 23    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 24    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 25    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 26    the court shall state on the record the reason for   SB0113- 14 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 2    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 3    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 4    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 5    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 6    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 7    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 8    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 9    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 10    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 11    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 12    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 13    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 14    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 15    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 16    criminal history, if available, and any written or 17    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 18    statements made by any person, if in the State's 19    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 20        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 21    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 22    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 23    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 24    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 25    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 26    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for   SB0113- 15 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 2    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.3        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 4    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 5    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 6    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 7    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 8    the defendant.9        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 10    release, and detention prior to trial must be 11    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 12    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 13    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 14    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 15dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 16defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 17person or persons or the community, based on the specific 18articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 19limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:20        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 21    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 22    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.23        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 24    including:25            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 26        history indicative of violent, abusive or assaultive   SB0113- 16 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 2        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 3        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 4        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.5            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 6        psychiatric or other similar social history which 7        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 8        nature, or lack of any such history.9        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 10    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 11    nature of the threat.12        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 13    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 14    them.15        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.16        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 17    complaining witness. 18        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 19    access to any weapon or weapons.20        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 21    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 22    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release or 23    other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 24    appeal or completion of sentence for an offense under 25    federal or state law.26        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in   SB0113- 17 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 2    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 3    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 4    or lack of such behavior.5    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 6detention:7        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 8    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 9    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 10    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 11    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 12    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 13    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;14        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 15    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 16    pending trial;17        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 18    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 19    communication with others of his or her choice by 20    visitation, mail and telephone; and21        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 22    required for appearances in connection with court 23    proceedings.24    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 25detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 26Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the   SB0113- 18 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 2on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 3is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 4the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 5release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 6any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 7the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 8from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 9good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.10    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 11before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 12is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 13of any person or persons or the community, based on the 14specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 15defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 16    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 17entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 18denying his or her pretrial release.19    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 20this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 21release.22    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 23shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 24defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 25proceedings.26    (m) Interest of victims.   SB0113- 19 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 2Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph (1) 3of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 4and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their opportunity 5at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 6    (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the court 7may impose a no contact provision with the victim or other 8interested party that shall be enforced while the defendant 9remains in custody. 10(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.) 11    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-822)12    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 13    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 14hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 15if:16        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 17    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 18    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 19    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment or 20    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 21    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 22    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 23    or persons or the community, based on the specific 24    articulable facts of the case;25        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real   SB0113- 20 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 2    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 3    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 4    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 5    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 6    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 7    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 8    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 9    of force against another person, residential burglary, 10    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 11    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 12    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 13    disfigurement or any other felony which involves the 14    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 15    disability or disfigurement; 16        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 17    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 18    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 19    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 20    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 21    of the threat upon which the charge is based;22        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 23    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 24    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 25    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 26    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact   SB0113- 21 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 2    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 3    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 4    or persons or the community, based on the specific 5    articulable facts of the case;6        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 7    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 8    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 9    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 10    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 11    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 12    case;13        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 14    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 15    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 16    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 17    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 18    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 19    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 20    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 21    the case; 22        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 23    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 24    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 25    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 26    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts   SB0113- 22 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    of the case:2            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 3        firearm);4            (B) Section 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge of a 5        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 6        designed or use for silencing the report of a 7        firearm);8            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 9        firearm);10            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 11        firearm by a repeat felony offender);12            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale or transfer 13        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 14        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 15        or flechette shells);16            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 17        firearms);18            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 19        firearms on the premises of any school);20            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 21        liquor license);22            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 23        firearm);24            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);25            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);26            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);  SB0113- 23 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 2        of a minor);3            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);4            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 5        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 6        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 7        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 8        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 9        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 10            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 11        manslaughter);12            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);13            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);14            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 15        endangerment);16            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 17            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 18        restraint); 19            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 20            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 21        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 22        discharge of a firearm); 23        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 24    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 25    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 26    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on   SB0113- 24 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    the specific articulable facts of the case: 2            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 3        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 4        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);5            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 6        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 7        influence while operating a school bus with 8        passengers);9            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 10        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 11        influence causing great bodily harm);12            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 13        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 14        influence after a previous reckless homicide 15        conviction);16            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 17        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 18        influence leading to death); or19            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 20        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 21        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 22        under the age of 16);23        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 24    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 25    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 26    real and present threat to the safety of any person or   SB0113- 25 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    persons or the community, based on the specific 2    articulable facts of the case; or 3        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 4    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:5            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 6        through (a)(7) of this Section; or7            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 8    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 9detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 10probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 11a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 12been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 13indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 14probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 15finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 16misdemeanor.17    (c) Timing of petition. 18        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 19    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 20    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 21    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 22    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 23    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 24    previously released shall not be detained.25        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 26    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested.   SB0113- 26 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 2    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 3    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 4    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 5    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 6    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 7    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 8    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 9    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 10    filing of the petition and the hearing.11    (d) Contents of petition.12        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 13    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 14    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 15    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 16    persons or the community, based on the specific 17    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.18        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 19    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 20    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 21    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 22    filing of the previous petition.23    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 24for pretrial release, and except as otherwise provided in 25subsection (e-1), the State shall bear the burden of proving 26by clear and convincing evidence that:  SB0113- 27 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 2    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 3    subsection (a), and4        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 5    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 6    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 7    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 8    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 9    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 10    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 11    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 12    1986, and13        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 14    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 15    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 16    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 17    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 18    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 19    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 20    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and21        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 22    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 23    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 24    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 25    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 26    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or   SB0113- 28 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 2    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 3    appear in court as required.4    (e-1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this 5Section, if the defendant is charged with a violation of 6Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act 7involving the manufacture or delivery, or possession with 8intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance, a 9counterfeit substance, or controlled substance analog of 15 10grams or more of a substance containing fentanyl, or an analog 11thereof, then the burden of proof is on the defendant to show 12by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant's pretrial 13release does not pose a real and present threat to the safety 14of any person or persons or the community, based on the 15specific articulable facts of the case. 16    (f) Conduct of the hearings.17        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 18    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 19    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 20    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 21    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 22    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 23    hearing.24        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 25    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.26        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by   SB0113- 29 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 2    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 3    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 4    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 5    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 6    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 7    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 8    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 9    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 10    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 11    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 12    conducted via a two-way audio-visual communication system, 13    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 14    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 15        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 16    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 17    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused 18    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 19    court determines that the physical health and safety of 20    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 21    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 22    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 23    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 24    operational challenges must be documented and approved by 25    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 26    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented   SB0113- 30 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 2    Courts every 6 months. 3        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 4    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 5    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 6    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 7    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 8    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 9    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 10    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 11    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 12    the court shall state on the record the reason for 13    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 14    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 15    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 16    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 17    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 18    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 19    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 20    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 21    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 22    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 23    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 24    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 25    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 26    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant,   SB0113- 31 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 2    criminal history, if available, and any written or 3    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 4    statements made by any person, if in the State's 5    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 6        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 7    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 8    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 9    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 10    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 11    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 12    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 13    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 14    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.15        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 16    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 17    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 18    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 19    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 20    the defendant.21        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 22    release, and detention prior to trial must be 23    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 24    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 25    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 26    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of   SB0113- 32 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 2defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 3person or persons or the community, based on the specific 4articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 5limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:6        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 7    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 8    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.9        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 10    including:11            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 12        history indicative of violent, abusive or assaultive 13        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 14        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 15        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 16        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.17            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 18        psychiatric or other similar social history which 19        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 20        nature, or lack of any such history.21        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 22    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 23    nature of the threat.24        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 25    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 26    them.  SB0113- 33 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.2        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 3    complaining witness. 4        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 5    access to any weapon or weapons.6        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 7    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 8    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release or 9    other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 10    appeal or completion of sentence for an offense under 11    federal or state law.12        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 13    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 14    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 15    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 16    or lack of such behavior.17    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 18detention:19        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 20    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 21    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 22    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 23    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 24    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 25    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;26        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the   SB0113- 34 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 2    pending trial;3        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 4    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 5    communication with others of his or her choice by 6    visitation, mail and telephone; and7        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 8    required for appearances in connection with court 9    proceedings.10    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 11detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 12Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 13offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 14on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 15is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 16the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 17release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 18any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 19the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 20from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 21good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.22    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 23before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 24is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 25of any person or persons or the community, based on the 26specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the   SB0113- 35 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 2    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 3entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 4denying his or her pretrial release.5    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 6this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 7release.8    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 9shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 10defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 11proceedings.12    (m) Interest of victims. 13    (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 14Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph (1) 15of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 16and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their opportunity 17at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 18    (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the court 19may impose a no contact provision with the victim or other 20interested party that shall be enforced while the defendant 21remains in custody. 22(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 23    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 24changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 25that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section   SB0113- 36 -LRB104 03070 RLC 13088 b1represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 2not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 3made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 4Public Act.